Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1801
Various purpose bonds; power to issue.

Whenever any city or village is authorized to issue bonds that would constitute a general obligation of the city or village and the city or village has taken all preliminary steps required for the issuance of two or more issuances of such bonds, except the enactment of an ordinance or resolution prescribing the form thereof, the city or village may combine all such proposed bonds into a single issue in the total amount of the aggregate of the proposed separate issues and issue and sell such bonds at not less than par. The bonds shall be known as Various Purpose Bonds of the City (or Village) of ........ .

Laws 1961, c. 56, § 1, p. 209.